Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,173
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Corporate name
of foreign corporation.

(1) If the corporate name
of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of section 21-2028,
the foreign corporation, in order to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority
to transact business in this state, may:

(a) Add the word corporation, incorporated, company, or limited,
or the abbreviation corp., inc., co., or ltd., to its corporate name for use
in this state; or

(b) Use a fictitious name to transact business in this state
if its real name is unavailable and it delivers to the Secretary of State
for filing a copy of the resolution of its board of directors, certified by
its secretary, adopting the fictitious name.

(2) Except as authorized by subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, the corporate name, including a fictitious name, of a foreign corporation
shall not be the same as or deceptively similar to, upon the records of the
Secretary of State, any of the names referenced in subdivisions (2)(a) through
(f) of this section:

(a) The corporate name of a corporation incorporated or authorized
to transact business in this state;

(b) A corporate name reserved or registered under section
21-2029 or 21-2030;

(c) The fictitious name of another foreign corporation authorized
to transact business in this state;

(d) The corporate name of a not-for-profit corporation incorporated
or authorized to transact business in this state;

(e) A trade name registered in this state pursuant to sections
87-208 to 87-219.01; and

(f) Any other business entity name registered or filed with
the Secretary of State pursuant to Nebraska law.

(3) A foreign corporation may apply to the Secretary of State
for authorization to use in this state the name of another corporation or
business entity, incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state,
that is the same as or deceptively similar to, upon his or her records, the
name applied for. The Secretary of State shall authorize use of the name applied
for if:

(a) The other corporation or business entity consents to the
use in writing; or

(b) The applicant delivers to the Secretary of State a certified
copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing
the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state.

(4) A foreign corporation may use in this state the name,
including the fictitious name, of another domestic or foreign corporation
or business entity that is used in this state if the other corporation or
business entity is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this
state and the foreign corporation:

(a) Has merged with the other corporation or business entity;

(b) Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation
or business entity; or

(c) Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including
the name, of the other corporation or business entity.

(5) If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business
in this state changes its corporate name to one that does not satisfy the
requirements of section 21-2028, it may not transact business in this state
under the changed name until it adopts a name satisfying the requirements
of section 21-2028 and obtains an amended certificate of authority under section
21-20,171.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 173;

Laws 1997, LB 44, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 453, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 464, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 4.